Utah statutes.
62A-15-610.   Objectives of state hospital and other facilities -- Persons who may be admitted to state hospital.

(1)  The objectives of the state hospital and other mental health facilities shall be to care for all persons within this state who are subject to the provisions of this chapter; and to furnish them with the proper attendance, medical treatment, seclusion, rest, restraint, amusement, occupation, and support that is conducive to their physical and mental well-being.

(2)  Only the following persons may be admitted to the state hospital:

(a)  persons 18 years of age and older who meet the criteria necessary for commitment under this part and who have severe mental disorders for whom no appropriate, less restrictive treatment alternative is available;

(b)  persons under 18 years of age who meet the criteria necessary for commitment under Part 7, Commitment of Persons Under Age 18 to Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, and for whom no less restrictive alternative is available;

(c)  persons adjudicated and found to be guilty and mentally ill under Title 77, Chapter 16a, Commitment and Treatment of Mentally Ill Persons;

(d)  persons adjudicated and found to be not guilty by reason of insanity who are under a subsequent commitment order because they are mentally ill and a danger to themselves or others, under Section 77-16a-302;

(e)  persons found incompetent to proceed under Section 77-15-6;

(f)  persons who require an examination under Title 77, Utah Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(g)  persons in the custody of the Department of Corrections, admitted in accordance with Section 62A-15-605.5, giving priority to those persons with severe mental disorders.

